Illinois, session 104th, HB997.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The DUI Prevention and Education Commission Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 70/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the DUI 8Prevention and Education Commission Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-196, eff. 1-1-20.)